Washington statutes.
RCW 18.44.121

Fees.

(1) The director shall charge and collect the following fees:

(a) A fee for filing an original or a renewal application for an escrow agent license, a fee for each application for an additional licensed location, a fee for an application for a change of address for an escrow agent, annual fees for the first office or location and for each additional office or location, and under RCW 43.135.055 the director shall set the annual fee for an escrow agent license up to five hundred sixty-five dollars in fiscal year 2000.

(b) A fee for filing an original or a renewal application for an escrow officer license, a fee for an application for a change of address for each escrow officer license being so changed, a fee to activate an inactive escrow officer license or transfer an escrow officer license, and under RCW 43.135.055 the director shall set the annual fee for an escrow officer license up to two hundred thirty-five dollars in fiscal year 2000.

(c) A fee for filing an application for a duplicate of an escrow agent license or of an escrow officer license lost, stolen, destroyed, or for replacement.

(d) A fee for providing license examinations.

(e) An hourly audit fee. In setting this fee, the director shall ensure that every examination and audit, or any part of the examination or audit, of any person licensed or subject to licensing in this state requiring travel and services outside this state by the director or by employees designated by the director, shall be at the expense of the person examined or audited at the hourly rate established by the director, plus the per diem compensation and actual travel expenses incurred by the director or his or her employees conducting the examination or audit. When making any examination or audit under this chapter, the director may retain attorneys, appraisers, independent certified public accountants, or other professionals and specialists as examiners or auditors, the cost of which shall be borne by the person who is the subject of the examination or audit.

(2) In establishing these fees, the director shall set the fees at a sufficient level to defray the costs of administering this chapter.

(3) All fees received by the director under this chapter shall be paid into the state treasury to the credit of the financial services regulation fund.

[ 2010 c 34 s 6; 2001 c 177 s 3; 1999 c 30 s 10; 1995 c 238 s 2; 1985 c 340 s 1; 1977 ex.s. c 156 s 7; 1971 ex.s. c 245 s 5; 1965 c 153 s 8. Formerly RCW 18.44.080.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2001 c 177: See note following RCW 43.320.080.

Effective date—1995 c 238: See note following RCW 18.44.011.